Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. District Attorneys

§ 9-1-801.
Office created; mandatory and permissive establishment.

There shall be in each judicial district in which any one (1) county has reached a population of sixty thousand (60,000) or more the office of district attorney. In each of the remaining judicial districts there shall be the office of district attorney whenever a majority of the county commissioners in each county within the judicial district shall resolve that such an office of district attorney should be created in that judicial district.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-519; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cited in

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

§ 9-1-802.
Election; term; qualifications; full-time; private practice prohibited; exception; salary; vacancies.

At the general election in 1982 and every four (4) years thereafter, a district attorney shall be elected in each judicial district in which the office of district attorney has been created six (6) months or more prior to the date of the general election. The district attorney shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until his successor is elected and qualified.

Each district attorney shall have been a licensed attorney for at least four (4) years and a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar immediately prior to his election.

Each district attorney shall devote full time to the performance of his duties and shall not engage in any private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his election if not in conflict with the duties of his office.

From and after January 3, 2011 until January 2, 2023, each district attorney shall receive an annual salary of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00). From and after January 2, 2023, each district attorney shall receive an annual salary not greater than the salary authorized for a circuit court judge in W.S.

5-1-110

as determined by the legislature.

A vacancy in the office of district attorney shall be filled by the board or boards of county commissioners under the procedure for filling vacancies in the office of a member of the state legislature or state senator established by W.S.

22-18-111

. Vacancies shall be filled until the next general election and the appointee shall be qualified pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-520; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 45, § 1; 1991, ch. 244, § 1; 1998, ch. 105, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 97, § 1; 2009, ch. 142, § 1; 2022 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (d), added “Until January 3, 2011” at the beginning of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (d), deleted the former first sentence, which read, “Until January 3, 2011, each district attorney shall receive an annual salary of ninety-four thousand five hundred dollars ($94,500.00)”; in the present first sentence, added “until January 2, 2023” and “not less than,” and added the last sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.

§ 9-1-803.
Salaries and expenses paid by legislative appropriation.

The salaries of the district attorney, any deputies or assistants and clerical staff and the administrative expenses of the office of district attorney shall be paid pursuant to legislative appropriation.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-521; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-804.
Duties and powers generally; employment of deputy and assistant district attorneys and other necessary personnel.

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, each district attorney has exclusive jurisdiction to:

Act as prosecutor for the state in all felony, misdemeanor and juvenile court proceedings arising in the counties in his district, and prosecute such cases in the district courts and courts of limited jurisdiction or in other counties upon a change of venue;

Defend against all petitions for writs of habeas corpus filed in his district by any person charged with or convicted of any public offense in his district. This duty does not extend to petitions filed by inmates of state penal institutions;

Render assistance as required by the attorney general in the preparation and argument of criminal appeals arising in his district and in the defense of petitions for habeas corpus filed by inmates in state institutions arising from alleged deprivation of rights at the time of or prior to conviction;

Appear before any judge in the preliminary examination of persons charged with any offense in his district;

Appear at all inquests held by any coroner in his district;

Appear at all sessions of any grand jury convened in any county within his district.

Each district attorney shall employ and assign to each county in the judicial district at least one (1) of the following to serve at his pleasure: a deputy district attorney, an assistant district attorney or a part-time assistant district attorney. The deputy, assistant or part-time assistant district attorney assigned to a county shall reside in the county and be a resident of Wyoming and his primary responsibility shall be to matters arising in the county.

Subject to the rules of the Wyoming personnel division as to compensation, and as is authorized by the approved budget, each district attorney may employ administrative and clerical personnel necessary for the proper and efficient operation of his office. Such personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the district attorney.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-522; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 171, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iv), deleted “justice of the peace or” following “Appear before any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Duty to file writ of review. —

In defendant's aggravated assault case, where the district court concluded that the prosecution's conduct provided grounds for a mistrial, granted the defense motion, and dismissed the case with prejudice on the basis of speedy trial concerns, the State's writ of review was appropriate. The State had no other adequate remedy, the issues presented were of constitutional magnitude and public importance, and it was not established that allowing the writ would place defendant in jeopardy for a second time. State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Prosecutors have no authority to grant immunity. —

A prosecuting attorney (district attorney or county attorney) in Wyoming has no authority to grant immunity to a witness. Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited in

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

Quoted

in

Hilderbrand v. Padget, 678 P.2d 870,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accused's release of liability, or stipulation that there was probable cause for criminal charge, in consideration of termination of prosecution as precluding malicious prosecution action, 26 ALR4th 245.

Termination of criminal proceedings as result of compromise or settlement of accused's civil liability as precluding malicious prosecution action, 26 ALR4th 565.

Admonitions against perjury or threats to prosecute potential defense witness, inducing refusal to testify, as prejudicial error, 88 ALR4th 388.

When is prosecutor entitled to absolute immunity from civil suit for damages under 42 USCS § 1983: post-Imbler cases, 67 ALR Fed 640.

§ 9-1-805.
Substitute where conflict of interest or refusal to act.

When the district attorney is interested or refuses to act in a prosecution, the court may direct or permit any member of the bar to act in the district attorney’s place.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-523; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Section does not abrogate executive function to district court.—

This section is not an abrogation of the executive function by the district court, since the district court is not assuming the duties of the prosecutor but rather naming another prosecutor to assume the duties of the first. In re Padget, 678 P.2d 870,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification or recusal of prosecuting attorney because of relationship with alleged victim or victim's family, 12 ALR5th 909.

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.

§ 9-1-806.
Deputy district attorneys; appointment; term; qualifications; full-time; private practice prohibited; exception; salary.

As is authorized by the approved budget, each district attorney may employ deputy district attorneys to serve at his pleasure as needed to properly discharge the duties of his office in addition to deputy district attorneys assigned to counties. Each deputy district attorney shall have been a licensed attorney for at least one (1) year and a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar immediately prior to his employment as deputy district attorney.

Each deputy district attorney shall devote full time to the performance of his duties and shall not engage in any private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his appointment if not in conflict with the duties of his office.

Deputy district attorneys shall receive an annual salary as determined by the Wyoming personnel division.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-524; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of the human resources division of the department of administration and fiscal control, see §

9-2-1022

.

§ 9-1-807.
Assistant district attorneys; appointment; term; qualifications; full-time; private practice prohibited; exception; salary; part-time; qualifications and salary thereof.

As is authorized by the approved budget, each district attorney may employ assistant district attorneys to serve at his pleasure as needed to properly discharge the duties of his office in addition to assistant district attorneys assigned to counties. Each assistant district attorney shall be a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar and shall act under the direction of the district attorney and his deputies.

Each full-time assistant district attorney shall devote full time to the performance of his duties and shall not engage in any private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his appointment if not in conflict with the duties of his office.

Full-time assistant district attorneys shall receive an annual salary as determined by the Wyoming personnel division.

Assistant district attorneys who serve in less than a full-time capacity shall be members in good standing of the Wyoming bar and shall act under the direction of the district attorney and his deputies. Part-time assistant district attorneys shall be compensated for services performed in an amount proportionate to the salary allowed for full-time services.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-525; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of the human resources division of the department of administration and fiscal control, see §

9-2-1022

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.

§ 9-1-808.
Deputy and assistant district attorneys; powers and duties.

Each deputy and assistant district attorney, under the direction and control of the district attorney, has the same powers and duties as the district attorney by whom he was appointed, except that all acts shall be done in the name of the district attorney.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-526; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-809.
Per diem and travel expenses.

Each district attorney, deputy district attorney, assistant district attorney or member of a district attorney’s staff while traveling on official business shall receive per diem and travel expenses as provided by law for state employees.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-527; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to transportation expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-103

.

§ 9-1-810.
Assistance of county attorneys in criminal matters.

Each district attorney may request the assistance of the county attorneys in his district in the preparation, prosecution and argument of criminal matters arising in any county within his district and each county attorney shall render aid and assistance as requested by the district attorney.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-528; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-811.
Provision of office space.

Each board of county commissioners shall provide suitable office space for the use of the district attorney to properly conduct the business of his office.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-529; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.